Chapter 4 Experience of Empire


Constructing an Anglo-American
Identity: The Journal of
William Byrd
 William Byrd II (1674–1744) was a type of British American one would not have encountered during the earliest years of settlement. This successful Tidewater planter was a product of a new, more cosmopolitan environment, and as an adult, Byrd seemed as much at home in London as in his native Virginia. In 1728, at the height of his political influence in Williamsburg, the capital of colonial Virginia, Byrd accepted a commission to help survey a disputed boundary between North Carolina and Virginia. During his long journey into the distant backcountry, Byrd kept a detailed journal, a satiric, often bawdy chronicle of daily events that is now regarded as a classic of early American literature. On his trip into the wilderness, Byrd met many different people. No sooner had he departed a familiar world of tobacco plantations than he came across a selfstyled “Hermit,” an Englishman who apparently preferred the freedom of the woods to the constraints of society. “He has no other Habitation but a green Bower or Harbour,” Byrd reported, “with a Female Domestick as wild & as dirty as himself.”

 As the boundary commissioners pushed farther into the backcountry, they encountered highly independent men and women of European descent, small frontier families that Byrd regarded as living no better than savages. He attributed their uncivilized behavior to a diet of too much pork. “The Truth of it is, these People live so much upon Swine’s flesh . . . [that it] makes them . . . extremely hoggish in their Temper, & many of them seem to Grunt rather than Speak in their ordinary conversation.” The wilderness journey also brought Byrd’s party of surveyors into regular contact with Native Americans, whom he properly distinguished as Catawba, Tuscarora, Usheree, and Sapponi Indians. yrd’s journal invites us to view the rapidly developing eighteenth-century backcountry from a fresh perspective. It was not a vast empty territory awaiting the arrival of European settlers. Maps often sustain this erroneous impression, depicting cities and towns, farms and plantations clustered along the Atlantic coast; they suggest a “line of settlement” steadily pushing outward into a huge blank area with no mark of civilization. The people Byrd met on his journey into the backcountry would not have understood

B


Read the Document


William Byrd II, Diary—An American Gentleman


 William Byrd II. Byrd’s History of the Dividing Line: Run in the Year 1728 contains a marvelously satirical account of the culture of poor country farmers in North Carolina.



CHAPT ER 4

EXPERIENCE OF EMPIRE: EIGHTEENTH-CENTURY AMERICA

 such maps. After all, the empty space on the maps was their home. They experienced the frontier as populous zones of many cultures stretching from the English and French settlements in the north all the way to the Spanish borderlands in the far southwest. The point is not to discount the significance of the older Atlantic settlements. During the eighteenth century, Britain’s thirteen mainland colonies underwent a profound transformation. The population in the colonies grew at unprecedented rates. German and Scots-Irish immigrants arrived in huge numbers. So too did African slaves. Wherever they lived, colonial Americans of this period were less isolated from one another than colonists had been during most of the seventeenth century. Indeed, after 1690, men and women expanded their cultural horizons, becoming part of a larger AngloAmerican empire. The change was striking. Colonists whose parents or grandparents had come to the New World to confront a “howling wilderness” now purchased imported European manufactures, read English journals, participated in imperial wars, and sought favors from a growing number of resident royal officials. No one—not even the inhabitants of the distant frontiers—could escape the influence of Britain. The cultural, economic, and political links connecting the colonists to the imperial center in London grew stronger with time. This surprising development raises a difficult question for the modern historian. If the eighteenth-century colonists were so powerfully attracted to Great Britain, then why did they ever declare independence? The answer may well be that as the colonists became more British, they inevitably became more American as well. This was a development of major significance, for it helps to explain the appearance after midcentury of genuine nationalist sentiment. Political, commercial, and military links that brought the colonists into more frequent contact with Great Britain also made them more aware of other colonists. It was within an expanding, prosperous empire that they first began seriously to consider what it meant to be American.

Growth and Diversity
 What difficulties did Native Americans face in maintaining their cultural independence on the frontier? The phenomenal growth of British America during the eighteenth century amazed Benjamin Franklin, one of the first persons to bring mathematical rigor to the study of demography. The population of the English colonies doubled approximately every twenty-five years, and, according to calculations Franklin made in 1751, if the expansion continued at such an extraordinary rate for another century or so, “the greatest Number of Englishmen will be on this Side [of] the water.” Accurate population data from the colonial period are extremely difficult to find. The first national census did not occur until 1790. Still, various sources surviving from prerevolutionary times indicate that the total white population of Britain’s thirteen mainland colonies rose from about 250,000 in 1700 to 2,150,000 in 1770, an annual growth rate of 3 percent. Few societies in recorded history have expanded so rapidly, and if the growth rate had not dropped substantially during the nineteenth and twentieth centuries, the current population of the United States would stand at well more than one billion people. Natural reproduction was responsible for most of the growth. More families bore children who in turn lived long enough to have

 children of their own. Because of this sudden expansion, the population of the late colonial period was strikingly young; approximately one-half of the populace at any given time was under age 16. Not only was the total population increasing at a very rapid rate; it also was becoming more dispersed and heterogeneous. Each year witnessed the arrival of thousands of non-English Europeans. Unlike those seventeenth-century English settlers in search of religious sanctuary or instant wealth (see Chapter 2), the newcomers generally transferred in the hope of obtaining their own land and setting up as independent farmers. These people often traveled to the backcountry, a region stretching approximately eight hundred miles from western Pennsylvania to Georgia. Although they planned to follow customs they had known in Europe, they found the challenge of surviving on the British frontier far more demanding than they had anticipated. They plunged into a complex, fluid, often violent society that included large numbers of Native Americans and African Americans as well as other Europeans.

Scots-Irish Flee English Oppression
 Non-English colonists poured into American ports throughout the eighteenth century, creating rich ethnic diversity in areas originally settled by Anglo-Saxons. The largest group of newcomers consisted of Scots-Irish. The experiences of these people in Great Britain influenced not only their decision to move to the New World but also their behavior once they arrived. During the seventeenth century, English rulers thought they could thoroughly dominate Catholic Ireland by transporting thousands of lowland Scottish Presbyterians to the northern region of that war-torn country. The plan failed. English officials who were members of the Anglican Church discriminated against the Presbyterians. They passed laws that placed the Scots-Irish at a severe disadvantage when they traded in England; they taxed them at exorbitant rates. After several poor harvests, many of the Scots-Irish elected to emigrate to America, where they hoped to find the freedom and prosperity that had been denied them in Ireland. “I have seen some of their letters to their friends here [Ireland],” one British agent reported in 1729, “. . . in which after they set forth and recommend the fruitfulness and commodities of the country [America], they tell them, that if they will but carry over a little money with them, they may for a small sum purchase considerable tracts of land.” Often entire Presbyterian congregations followed charismatic ministers to the New World, intent on replicating a distinctive, fiercely independent culture on the frontier. It is estimated that one hundred fifty thousand Scots-Irish migrated to the colonies before the Revolution. Most Scots-Irish immigrants landed initially in Philadelphia, but instead of remaining in that city, they carved out farms on Pennsylvania’s western frontier. The colony’s proprietors welcomed the influx of new settlers, for it seemed they would form an ideal barrier between the Indians and the older, coastal communities. The Penn family soon had second thoughts, however. The ScotsIrish squatted on whatever land looked best, and when colony officials pointed out that large tracts had already been reserved, the immigrants retorted that “it was against the laws of God and nature that so much land should be idle when so many Christians wanted it to labour on and to raise their bread.” Wherever they located, the Scots-Irish challenged established authority.

Growth and Diversity


Read the Document


Benjamin Franklin,
“Observations Concerning the Increase of Mankind”


African


German


Dutch


Scots-Irish


English


Scottish


Micmac


E
U


R.


Abenaki


Algonquin


Chippewa


N.H.


Portsmouth


Boston
Providence
Iroquois
Newport
Hartford
New Haven
R.I.
Susquehannock
Perth
CONN.
Amboy New York N.J. Philadelphia Burlington Miami PENN. New Castle MD. DEL. Annapolis Shawnee VA. Williamsburg Shenandoah R. James R. MASS. 
N.Y.


 io Oh

EN AN DO AH

R.


VA LL EY

Great
Lakes


 MAINE (part of Mass.)

St
.L
 aw re nc e

B
Q


E


C


Chickasaw


New Bern


S.C.


Sa


 va nn

Mis


 siss

N.C.


R.


 ippi

R.


 ee eD Pe

SH
Cherokee 
Charles Town


.


 ah R GA.

ATLANTIC OCEAN

Choctaw


Savannah


Creek


Proclamation Line of 1763
Seminole


DISTRIBUTION OF EUROPEAN AND AFRICAN IMMIGRANTS IN THE THIRTEEN COLONIES A
flood of non-English immigrants swept the British colonies between 1700 and 1775. 
Germans Search for a Better Life
 A second large body of non-English settlers, more than one hundred thousand people, came from the upper Rhine Valley, the German Palatinate. Some of the migrants, especially those who relocated to America around the turn of the century, belonged to small pietistic Protestant sects whose religious views were somewhat similar to those of the Quakers. These Germans moved to the New World primarily in the hope of finding religious toleration. Under the guidance of Francis Daniel Pastorius (1651–1720), a group of Mennonites established in Pennsylvania a prosperous community known as Germantown. By midcentury, however, the characteristics of the German migration had begun to change. Large numbers of Lutherans transferred to the Middle Colonies. Unlike members of the pietistic sects, these men and women were not in search of religious freedom. Rather, they traveled to the New World looking to better their material lives. The Lutheran Church in Germany initially tried to maintain control over the distant congregations, but even though the migrants themselves fiercely preserved many aspects of traditional



 German culture, they were eventually forced to accommodate to new social conditions. Henry Melchior Mühlenberg (1711–1787), a tireless leader, helped German Lutherans through a difficult cultural adjustment, and in 1748, Mühlenberg organized a meeting of local pastors and lay delegates that ordained ministers of their own choosing, an act of spiritual independence that has been called “the most important single event in American Lutheran history.” The German migrants—mistakenly called Pennsylvania Dutch because the English confused deutsch (meaning “German”) with Dutch (“a person from Holland”)—began reaching Philadelphia in large numbers after 1717, and by 1766, persons of German stock accounted for more than one-third of Pennsylvania’s total population. Even their most vocal detractors admitted the Germans were the best farmers in the colony. Ethnic differences in Pennsylvania bred disputes. The Scots-Irish as well as the Germans preferred to live with people of their own background, and they sometimes fought to keep members of the other nationality out of their neighborhoods. The English were suspicious of both groups. They could not comprehend why the Germans insisted on speaking German in America. In 1753, for example, Franklin described these settlers as “the most stupid of their nation.” He warned that “unless the stream of [German] importation could be turned from this to other colonies . . . they will soon outnumber us, . . . [and] all the advantages we have, will in my opinion, be not able to preserve our language, and even our government will become precarious.” As Franklin’s remarks suggest, the pressure on non-English colonists to accommodate to the dominant culture—in other words, to “Anglicize” their manners and behavior—was very great. In comparison to some of his contemporaries, Franklin seemed a moderate critic of the German and Scots-Irish settlers. Others threatened violence against the newcomers who refused to conform to English ways. Such prejudice may have persuaded members of both groups to search for new homes. After 1730, Germans and Scots-Irish pushed south from western Pennsylvania into the Shenandoah Valley, thousands of them settling in the backcountry of Virginia and the Carolinas. The Germans usually remained wherever they found unclaimed fertile land. By contrast, the Scots-Irish often moved two or three times, acquiring a reputation as a rootless people. Wherever the newcomers settled, they often found themselves living beyond the effective authority of the various colonial governments. To be sure, backcountry residents petitioned for assistance during wars against the Indians, but most of the time they preferred to be left alone. These conditions heightened the importance of religious institutions within the small ethnic communities. Although the original stimulus for coming to America may have been a desire for economic independence and prosperity, backcountry families—especially the Scots-Irish—flocked to evangelical Protestant preachers, to Presbyterian, and later Baptist and Methodist ministers who not only fulfilled the settlers’ spiritual needs but also gave scattered backcountry communities a pronounced moral character that survived long after the colonial period.

Convict Settlers
 Since the story of European migration tends to be upbeat—men and women engaged in a largely successful quest for a better material life—it often is forgotten that British courts compelled many



CHAPT ER 4

EXPERIENCE OF EMPIRE: EIGHTEENTH-CENTURY AMERICA

 people to come to America. Indeed, the African slaves were not the only large group of people coerced into moving to the New World. In 1718, Parliament passed the Transportation Act, allowing judges in England, Scotland, and Ireland to send convicted felons to the American colonies. Between 1718 and 1775, the courts shipped approximately fifty thousand convicts across the Atlantic. Some of these men and women may actually have been dangerous criminals, but the majority seem to have committed minor crimes against property. Although transported convicts—almost 75 percent of whom were young males—escaped the hangman, they found life difficult in the colonies. Eighty percent of them were sold in the Chesapeake colonies as indentured servants. At best they faced an uncertain future, and it is probably not surprising that few former convicts prospered in America. British authorities lavished praise on this system. According to one writer, transportation drained “the Nation of its offensive Rubbish, without taking away their Lives.” Although Americans purchased the convict servants, they expressed fear that these men and women would create a dangerous criminal class. In one irate essay, Benjamin Franklin asked his readers to consider just how the colonists might repay the leaders of Great Britain for shipping so many felons to America. He suggested that rattlesnakes might be the appropriate gift. “I would propose to have them carefully distributed . . .,” Franklin wrote, “in the Gardens of all the Nobility and Gentry throughout the Nation; but particularly in the Gardens of the Prime Ministers, the Lords of Trade and Members of Parliament.” The Revolution forced the British courts to redirect the flow of convicts to another part of the world; an indirect result of American independence was the founding of Australia by transported felons.

Native Americans Stake Out a
Middle Ground
 In some histories of the colonial period, Native Americans make only a brief appearance, usually during the earliest years of conquest and settlement. After initial contact with the first European invaders, the Indians seem mysteriously to disappear from the central narrative of colonization, and it is not until the nineteenth century that they turn up again, this time to wage a last desperate battle against the encroachment of white society. This obviously inadequate account slights one of the richer chapters of Native American history. During much of the seventeenth century, various Indian groups who contested the English settlers for control of coastal lands suffered terribly, sometimes from war, but more often from the spread of contagious diseases such as smallpox. The two races found it very difficult to live in close proximity. As one Indian informed the members of the Maryland assembly in 1666, “Your hogs & Cattle injure Us, You come too near Us to live & drive Us from place to place. We can fly no farther; let us know where to live & how to be secured for the future from the Hogs & Cattle.” Against such odds the Indians managed to survive. By the eighteenth century, the site of the most intense and creative contact between the races had shifted to the cis-Mississippian west, that is, to the huge territory between the Appalachian Mountains and the Mississippi River, where several hundred thousand Native Americans made their homes.

 Tishcohan, chief of the Delaware tribe that lost much of its land in Thomas Penn’s Walking Purchase of 1737, is shown here in a 1735 portrait by Gustavus Hesselius. Although treaties and agreements with European settlers were often detrimental to Native Americans, some alliances in the “middle ground” allowed the tribes to play the French against the British. Alliances were often signified by tokens such as certificates, calumets (ceremonial pipes), wampum belts, and medals.

 Many Indians had only recently migrated to the area. The Delaware, for example, retreated to far western Pennsylvania and the Ohio Valley to escape almost continuous confrontation with advancing European invaders. Other Indians drifted west in less happy circumstances. They were refugees, the remnants of Native American groups who had lost so many people that they could no longer sustain an independent cultural identity. These survivors joined with other Indians to establish new multiethnic communities. In this respect, the Native American villages may not have seemed all that different from the mixed European settlements of the backcountry. (See the Feature Essay, “Conquest by Other Means: The Pennsylvania Walking Purchase,” pp. 84–85.) Stronger groups of Indians, such as the Creek, Choctaw, Chickasaw, Cherokee, and Shawnee, generally welcomed the refugees. Strangers were formally adopted to take the places of family members killed in battle or overcome by sickness, and it should be appreciated that many seemingly traditional Indian villages of the eighteenth century actually represented innovative responses to rapidly shifting external conditions. As historian Peter Wood explained, “Physically and linguistically diverse groups

Spanish Borderlands of the Eighteenth Century


 moved to form loosely organized confederacies, unions of mutual convenience, that effectively restrained interethnic hostilities.” The concept of a middle ground—a term that has only recently entered the interpretive vocabulary—helps us more fully to comprehend how eighteenth-century Indians held their own in the backcountry beyond the Appalachian Mountains. The Native Americans never intended to isolate themselves completely from European contact. They relied on white traders, French as well as English, to provide essential metal goods and weapons. The goal of the Indian confederacies was rather to maintain a strong independent voice in these commercial exchanges, whenever possible playing the French against the British, and so long as they had sufficient military strength— that is, large numbers of healthy armed warriors—they compelled everyone who came to negotiate in the “middle ground” to give them proper respect. It would be incorrect, therefore, to characterize their relations with the Europeans as a stark choice between resistance or accommodation, between total war or abject surrender. Native Americans took advantage of rivals when possible; they compromised when necessary. It is best to imagine the Indians’ middle ground as an open, dynamic process of creative interaction. However desirable they may have appeared, European goods subtly eroded traditional structures of Native American authority. During the period of earliest encounter with white men, Indian leaders reinforced their own power by controlling the character and flow of commercial exchange. If a trader wanted a rich supply of animal skins, for example, he soon learned that he had better negotiate directly with a chief or tribal elder. But as the number of European traders operating within the “middle ground” expanded, ordinary Indians began to bargain on their own account, obtaining colorful and durable manufactured items without first consulting a Native American leader. Independent commercial dealings of this sort tended further to weaken the Indians’ ability to resist organized white aggression. As John Stuart, a superintendent of Indian affairs, explained in 1761, “A modern Indian cannot subsist without Europeans; And would handle a Flint Ax or any other rude utensil used by his ancestors very awkwardly; So that what was only convenience at first is now become Necessity.” The survival of the middle ground depended ultimately on factors over which the Native Americans had little control. Imperial competition between France and Great Britain enhanced the Indians’ bargaining position, but after the British defeated the French in 1763, the Indians no longer received the same solicitous attention as they had in earlier times. Keeping old allies happy seemed to the British a needless expense. Moreover, contagious disease continued to take a fearful toll. In the southern backcountry between 1685 and 1790, the Indian population dropped an astounding 72 percent. In the Ohio Valley, the numbers suggest similar rates of decline. In fact, there is some evidence that British military officers practiced germ warfare against the Native Americans, giving them blankets contaminated by smallpox. Based on experience, the officers knew that personal belongings such as blankets taken from the sick were contaminated and, thus, that giving these items to the Indians would put them at risk. By the time the United States took control of this region, the middle ground itself had become a casualty of history.



Spanish Borderlands of the
Eighteenth Century
 Why was the Spanish empire unable to control its northern frontier? In many traditional histories of North America, the Spanish make only a brief appearance, usually as fifteenth-century conquistadors. But as soon as they have conquered Mexico, they are dropped from the story as if they had no serious part to play in the ongoing development of the continent. This is, of course, a skewed perspective that masks the roots of ethnic diversity in the United States. As anyone who visits the modern American Southwest quickly discovers, Spanish administrators and priests—not to mention ordinary settlers—left a lasting imprint on the cultural landscape of this country. Until 1821, when Mexico declared independence from Madrid, Spanish authorities struggled to control a vast northern frontier. During the eighteenth century, the Spanish empire in North America included widely dispersed settlements such as San Francisco, San Diego, Santa Fe, San Antonio, and St. Augustine. In these borderland communities, European colonists mixed with peoples of other races and backgrounds, forming multicultural societies. According to historian Ramón A. Gutiérrez, the Spanish provinces present a story of “the

 Baroque-style eighteenth-century Spanish mission at San Xavier del Bac in present-day Arizona. Spanish missions dotted the frontier of northern New Spain from Florida to California.

 Complete the Assignment Conquest by Other Means: The Pennsylvania Walking Purchase on myhistorylab

Feature
Essay


Conquest by Other Means
The Pennsylvania Walking
Purchase


 William Penn’s Treaty with the Indians, painted by Benjamin West in 1771, presents an idealized picture of relations between the Pennsylvania government and its Indian neighbors. Here the pious William Penn offers the Indians trade goods for their lands. Source: Courtesy of the Pennsylvania Academy of the Fine Arts, Philadelphia. Gift of Mrs. Sarah Harrison (The Joseph Harrison, Jr. Collection).

E


 uropean conquest of Native Americans represents a black mark on the history of the New World. Violent dispossession, murder, and near genocide of America’s native inhabitants has always fit uneasily into a history of national progress. Colonial writers sought to cover up these disturbing histories by creating myths of “good settlers” who allegedly respected Native American rights



 and chose to buy Indian lands rather than seize them through force. But such reworkings of history overlook the threats of violence that often surrounded these supposedly “fair” negotiations. Pennsylvania’s infamous “Walking Purchase” of 1737 offers a dramatic example of how the myth of a fair deal could cover English self-interest and intimidation. When he died in 1718, William Penn, the Quaker founder of Pennsylvania, left

 his sons a legacy of peaceful co-existence between English and Indian. He also burdened them with an imposing debt. During the 1720s, anxious to restore their finances, the Penn heirs began to sell off lands between Pennsylvania and New Jersey, in a region known as the Forks. Settlers coveted the abundant lumber, iron ore, and fertile soil found along the Delaware River and were willing to pay good prices. Only one obstacle stood in the way of their plan to trade frontier

 lands for English currency. The Penns did not actually own the lands that they were selling. These lands belonged to the region’s Native American nation, the Delawares (who referred to themselves as the Lenapes), and they refused to sell. The Penns’ next move surprised the Delawares. Thomas Penn, William Penn’s eldest son, produced what he claimed to be an old deed for lands in the Forks purchased by his father in 1686. The document granted to Pennsylvania a tract of land extending along the Delaware River and containing “as much Land as a man could walk in a Day and half” – a very imprecise measure of distance. Since the original deed was incomplete (it had not been signed and did not even list all of the terms of the purchase), Penn had a new “copy” drawn up. He presented this document to the Delawares as proof of a legally binding contract transferring the Indian lands in the Forks to Pennsylvania. The Delawares were not fooled. Nutimus, leader of the Delawares who lived in the Forks region, challenged the Penns’ version of history. The elders among his people remembered that although a land transfer had been discussed, no contract had ever been signed, and William Penn and his agents had never delivered payment. The new deed was a clumsy forgery. Cries of fraud did not discourage Thomas Penn. He struck up an understanding with the powerful Iroquois Confederacy—an alliance of six Native American nations centered around the Great Lakes. The government of Pennsylvania promised to support the Iroquois in pressing land claims against native tribes to the south and west. The Iroquois in turn pledged to support Pennsylvania in its dealings with the Delawares. As one historian has put it, the Delawares found themselves caught between “an Iroquois hammer and a Pennsylvania anvil.” Not powerful enough to challenge both the Pennsylvanians and their Iroquois allies, Nutimus and three other Delaware leaders put their marks on the fraudulent deed. The Walking of the Boundary occurred on September 19, 1737.

 The whole episode was a farce. Thomas Penn had taken the initiative to have a path cleared through the trees for his walkers. Previously, when William Penn had purchased lands from the Delawares, the parties that walked off the boundaries had traveled at a normal traveler’s pace winding through the forest and stopping along the way to take meals. Now the three walkers who took off into the Pennsylvania woods set an exhausting pace, each promised a handsome reward if he should be the one that walked the farthest in the allotted day and a half. One dropped out by day’s end. A second collapsed the next morning and died from exhaustion a week later. The final walker covered more than 60 miles of wilderness in the 18 hours of daylight allotted for his task. The Delawares protested this injustice, grumbling about what they named “The Hurry Walk,” but could do little about it. In 1740 they filed a complaint with the Pennsylvania Superior Court, warning that “If this Practice must hold why we are No more Brothers and Friends but much more like Open Enemies.” The Governor of Pennsylvania dismissed the Delawares’ complaint. When the Delawares refused to concede their claims in the Forks, the Pennsylvania government turned to its Iroquois allies. At a council held in 1742, the Iroquois headman Canasatego told Nutimus and the Delawares “You ought to be taken by the Hair of the Head and skak’d severely till you recover your Senses . . . We conquered you, we made Women of you. . . . This Land that you Claim is gone.” Canastego ordered the Delawares to remove north to the Wyoming or Susquehanna Valleys. Swindled by the Pennsylvanians, betrayed by the Iroquois who they had once called their “cousins,” and pressed on every side by encroaching white settlers, Nutimus and his Delawares abandoned the Delaware Valley and withdrew to the west. Peaceful complaints had proven ineffectual. All the Delawares could do now was nurse their grievances and wait. The waiting ended in 1755, with the beginning of the French and Indian War. The war began in catastrophe for the

 British and their Iroquois allies in North America, providing what one Delaware described as “a favourable Opportunity for taking revenge.” Still seething over the injustice of the Walking Purchase, Delaware warriors and their Shawnee allies fell upon the Pennsylvania settlements along the outskirts of the Walking Purchase lands. Led by Nutimus’ nephew Teedyuscung, these warriors burned homes and fields and took over one hundred English lives. The war soon turned in Britain’s favor. As British and Iroquois troops routed their French and Indian enemies in Canada and the Ohio territory, the Delawares realized that they would have to sue for peace. In 1766, the Delawares signed a treaty that relinquished the remainder of their Pennsylvania lands and removed permanently towards the west. In 1771, Thomas Penn commissioned the great early American artist Benjamin West to create a painting commemorating his father’s compassion and fair treatment of Pennsylvania’s Indian peoples. The image shows William Penn meeting with Indian leaders, bargaining with them to purchase land where English settlers might farm and raise families. West’s painting presents a highly flattering image of Pennsylvania history and of the Penn family. It looks past the violence of 1755 and the underhanded dealings of 1737. It takes as its subject the much revered elder Penn, who had once admonished his children to “let justice have its impartial course . . . fly to no deceits to support or cover injustice.” In the end, Thomas Penn betrayed his father’s advice. In allowing his greed for land to overpower his sense of propriety and respect for the rights of the Delaware Indians, Thomas Penn set an example emulated far too often throughout American history.

QUESTIONS FOR DISCUSSION 1.
Why did Thomas Penn invent a phony deed for Delaware lands? 2. Why did the Delawares side with the French during the French and Indian War? 


CHAPT ER 4

EXPERIENCE OF EMPIRE: EIGHTEENTH-CENTURY AMERICA

 complex web of interactions between men and women, young and old, rich and poor, slave and free, Spaniard and Indian, all of whom fundamentally depended on the other for their own self-definition.”

 with which Florida is painted,” the governor of Cuba complained in 1673. “Only hoodlums and the mischievous go there from Cuba.” California never figured prominently in Spain’s plans for the New World. Early explorers reported finding only impoverished Indians living along the Pacific coast. Adventurers saw no natural resources worth mentioning, and since the area proved extremely difficult to reach from Mexico City—the overland trip could take months— California received little attention. Fear that the Russians might seize the entire region belatedly sparked Spanish activity, however, and after 1769, two indomitable servants of empire, Fra Junípero Serra and Don Gaspar de Portolá, organized permanent missions and presidios (forts) at San Diego, Monterey, San Francisco, and Santa Barbara.

Conquering the Northern Frontier
 Not until late in the sixteenth century did Spanish settlers, led by Juan de Oñate, establish European communities north of the Rio Grande. The Pueblo Indians resisted the invasion of colonists, soldiers, and missionaries, and in a major rebellion in 1680 led by El Popé, the native peoples drove the whites completely out of New Mexico. “The heathen have conceived a mortal hatred for our holy faith and enmity for the Spanish nation,” concluded one imperial bureaucrat. Not until 1692 were the Spanish able to reconquer this fiercely contested area. By then, Native American hostility coupled with the settlers’ failure to find precious metal had cooled Spain’s enthusiasm for the northern frontier. Concern over French encroachment in the Southeast led Spain to colonize St. Augustine (Florida) in 1565. Although the enterprise never flourished, it claims attention as the first permanent European settlement established in what would become the United States, predating the founding of Jamestown and Plymouth by several decades. Pedro Menéndez de Avilés brought some fifteen hundred soldiers and settlers to St. Augustine, where they constructed an impressive fort, but the colony failed to attract additional Spanish migrants. “It is hard to get anyone to go to St. Augustine because of the horror

Read the Document


Peoples of the Spanish Borderlands
 In sharp contrast to the English frontier settlements of the eighteenth century, the Spanish outposts in North America grew very slowly. A few Catholic priests and imperial administrators traveled to the northern provinces, but the danger of Indian attack as well as a harsh physical environment discouraged ordinary colonists. The European migrants were overwhelmingly male, most of them soldiers in the pay of the empire. Although some colonists came directly from Spain, most had been born in other Spanish colonies such as Minorca, the Canaries, or New Spain, and because European women rarely appeared on the frontier, Spanish males formed relationships with Indian women, fathering large numbers of mestizos, children of mixed race.

Testimony by Pedro Naranjo to Spanish Authorities


 Spain's North American empire

M
 iss

 is

 si p pi



 500 miles 500 kilometers

R.


 CALIFORNIA

San Francisco
(1776)




Miwok


Monterey (1770)


San José (1777)
Alta
St. Louis


San Antonio de Padua (1771)


Ute


San Luis Obispo
(1772)


Chumash
Santa Barbara (1782) Los Angeles (1781)
San Gabriel (1771)
San Juan Capistrano (1776) Ipai


R.
 io Oh

Navajo


Pueblo
NEW MEXICO

San Diego (1769)


ATLANTIC OCEAN

Wichita
Santa Fe


Quapaw
LOUISIANA
Comanche Lipán Apache 
Pima


Coahuiltecan
Monterrey


Choctaw


Lower Creek


Tonkawa
Hasinai


TEXAS
San Antonio 
PACIFIC OCEAN

Creek
Chickasaw


St. Augustine
New Orleans


 FLORIDA

Gulf of
Mexico


THE SPANISH BORDERLANDS, CA. 1770
In the late eighteenth century, Spain’s North American empire extended across what is now the southern United States from Florida through Texas and New Mexico to California. 
The Impact of European Ideas on American Culture


 As in other European frontiers of the eighteenth century, encounters with Spanish soldiers, priests, and traders altered Native American cultures. The experience here was quite different from that of the whites and Indians in the British backcountry. The Spanish exploited Native American labor, reducing entire Indian villages to servitude. Many Indians moved to the Spanish towns, and although they lived in close proximity to the Europeans—something rare in British America—they were consigned to the lowest social class, objects of European contempt. However much their material conditions changed, the Indians of the Southwest resisted strenuous efforts to convert them to Catholicism. The Pueblo maintained their own religious forms—often at great personal risk—and they sometimes murdered priests who became too intrusive. Angry Pueblo Indians at Taos reportedly fed the hated Spanish friars corn tortillas containing urine and mouse meat. The Spanish empire never had the resources necessary to secure the northern frontier fully. The small military posts were intended primarily to discourage other European powers such as France, Great Britain, and Russia from taking possession of territory claimed by Spain. It would be misleading, however, to overemphasize the fragility of Spanish colonization. The urban design and public architecture of many southwestern cities still reflect the vision of the early Spanish settlers, and to a large extent, the old borderlands remain Spanish speaking to this day.

The Impact of European Ideas on
American Culture




 of the mother country. They sponsored concerts and plays; they learned to dance. Women as well as men picked up the new fashions quickly, and even though most of them had never been outside the colony of their birth, they sometimes appeared to be the products of London’s best families. It was in the cities, also, that wealthy merchants transformed commercial profits into architectural splendor, for, in their desire to outdo one another, they built grand homes of enduring beauty. Most of these buildings are described as Georgian because they were constructed during the reign of Britain’s early Hanoverian kings, who all happened to be named George. Actually these homes were provincial copies of grand country houses of Great Britain. They drew their inspiration from the great Italian Renaissance architect Andrea Palladio (1508–1580), who had incorporated classical themes into a rigidly symmetrical form. Palladio’s ideas were popularized in the colonies by James Gibbs, an Englishman whose Book of Architecture (1728) provided blueprints for the most spectacular homes of mid-eighteenth-century America. Their owners filled the houses with fine furniture. Each city patronized certain skilled craftsmen, but the artisans of Philadelphia were known for producing magnificent copies of the works of Thomas Chippendale, Great Britain’s most famous furniture designer. These developments gave American cities an elegance they had not possessed in the previous century. One foreign visitor noted of Philadelphia in 1748 that “its natural advantages, trade, riches and power, are by no means inferior to any, even of the most ancient towns of Europe.” As this traveler understood, the cultural impact of the cities went far beyond the number of people who actually lived there.

 How did European ideas affect eighteenth-century American life?

Ben Franklin and American
Enlightenment


 The character of the older, more established British colonies changed almost as rapidly as that of the backcountry. The rapid growth of an urban cosmopolitan culture impressed eighteenth-century commentators, and even though most Americans still lived on scattered farms, they had begun to participate aggressively in an exciting consumer marketplace that expanded their imaginative horizons.

 European historians often refer to the eighteenth century as an Age of Reason. During this period, a body of new, often radical, ideas swept through the salons and universities, altering the way that educated Europeans thought about God, nature, and society. This intellectual revolution, called the Enlightenment, involved the work of Europe’s greatest minds, men such as Newton and Locke, Voltaire and Hume. Enlightenment thinkers shared basic assumptions. Philosophers of the Enlightenment replaced the concept of original sin with a much more optimistic view of human nature. A benevolent God, having set the universe in motion, gave human beings the power of reason to enable them to comprehend the orderly workings of his creation. Everything, even human society, operated according to these mechanical rules. The responsibility of right-thinking men and women, therefore, was to make certain that institutions such as church and state conformed to self-evident natural laws. It was possible—or so some philosophers claimed—to achieve perfection in this world. In fact, human suffering had come about only because people had lost touch with the fundamental insights of reason. The writings of these thinkers eventually reached the colonies, where they received a mixed reception. On the whole, the American Enlightenment was a rather tame affair compared to its European counterpart, for while the colonists welcomed experimental science, they defended the tenets of traditional Christianity. For many Americans, the appeal of the Enlightenment was its focus on a search for useful knowledge, ideas, and inventions

Provincial Cities
 Considering the rate of population growth, it is surprising to discover how few eighteenth-century Americans lived in cities. Boston, Newport, New York, Philadelphia, and Charles Town—the five largest cities—contained only about 5 percent of the colonial population. In 1775, none had more than forty thousand persons. The explanation for the relatively slow development of colonial American cities lies in their highly specialized commercial character. Colonial port towns served as entrepôts, intermediary trade and shipping centers where bulk cargoes were broken up for inland distribution and where agricultural products were gathered for export. They did not support large-scale manufacturing. Indeed, the pool of free urban laborers was quite small, since the type of person who was forced to work for wages in Europe usually became a farmer in America. Yet despite the limited urban population, cities profoundly influenced colonial culture. It was in the cities that Americans were exposed to and welcomed the latest English ideas. Wealthy colonists—merchants and lawyers—tried to emulate the culture



CHAPT ER 4

EXPERIENCE OF EMPIRE: EIGHTEENTH-CENTURY AMERICA

 minister described as “full freighted with Nonesense, Unmannerliness, Railery, Prophaneness, Immorality, A r ro g an c e, C a lu m n i e s , Lyes, Contradictions, and what not, all tending to Quarrels and Divisions and to Debauch and Corrupt the Minds and Manners of New England.” Franklin got the point; he left Massachusetts in 1723 in search of a less hostile intellectual environment. After he had moved to Philadelphia, leaving behind an irritable brother as well as New England Puritanism, Franklin devoted himself to the pursuit of useful knowledge, ideas that would increase the happiness of his fellow Americans. Franklin never denied the existence of God. Rather, he pushed the Lord aside, making room for the This 1743 map of Boston depicts the port city as an active commercial and cultural center, with many wharves, buildings, free exercise of human reachurches, and meeting halls. son. Franklin tinkered, experimented, and reformed. Almost that would improve the quality of human life. What mattered was everything he encountered in his daily life aroused his curiosity. His practical experimentation. A speech delivered in 1767 before the investigation of electricity brought him world fame, but Franklin members of the American Society in Philadelphia reflected the was never satisfied with his work in this field until it yielded practical new utilitarian spirit: “Knowledge is of little Use when confined application. In 1756, he invented the lightning rod. He also designed to mere Speculation,” the colonist explained, “But when specua marvelously efficient stove that is still used today. In modern lative Truths are reduced to Practice, when Theories grounded America, Franklin has become exactly what he would have wanted upon Experiments . . . and the Arts of Living made more easy and to be, a symbol of material progress through human ingenuity. comfortable . . . Knowledge then becomes really useful.” Franklin energetically promoted the spread of reason. In The Enlightenment spawned scores of earnest scientific Philadelphia, he organized groups that discussed the latest European tinkerers, people who dutifully recorded changes in temperaliterature, philosophy, and science. In 1727, for example, he “form’d ture, the appearance of strange plants and animals, and the details most of my ingenious Acquaintances into a Club for mutual of astronomic phenomena. While these eighteenth-century Improvement, which we call’d the Junto.” Four years later Franklin Americans made few earth-shattering discoveries, they did encourtook a leading part in the formation of the Library Company, a volage their countrymen, especially those who attended college, to untary association that for the first time allowed people like him to apply reason to the solution of social and political problems. pursue “useful knowledge.” The members of these societies comBenjamin Franklin (1706–1790) absorbed the new cosmopolitan municated with Americans living in other colonies, providing them culture. European thinkers regarded him as a genuine philosophe, a not only with new information but also with models for their own person of reason and science, a role that he self-consciously cultivated clubs and associations. Such efforts broadened the intellectual horiwhen he visited England and France in later life. Franklin had little zons of many colonists, especially those who lived in cities. formal education, but as a young man working in his brother’s print shop, he managed to keep up with the latest intellectual currents. Economic Transformation In 1721, Franklin and his brother founded the New England Courant, a weekly newspaper that satirized Boston’s political The colonial economy kept pace with the stunning growth in and religious leaders in the manner of the contemporary British population. During the first three-quarters of the eighteenth cenpress. Writing under the name Silence Dogood, young Franklin tury, the population increased at least tenfold, and yet even with so asked his readers “Whether a Commonwealth suffers more by many additional people to feed and clothe, the per capita income hypocritical Pretenders to Religion, or by the openly Profane?” did not decline. Indeed, with the exception of poor urban dwellers, Proper Bostonians were not prepared for a journal that one such as sailors whose employment varied with the season, white

The Impact of European Ideas on American Culture


 Americans did quite well. An abundance of land and the extensive growth of agriculture accounted for their economic success. New farmers were able not only to provide for their families’ well-being but also to sell their crops in European and West Indian markets. Each year, more Americans produced more tobacco, wheat, or rice—to cite just the major export crops—and by this means, they maintained a high level of individual prosperity without developing an industrial base. At midcentury, colonial exports flowed along well-established routes. More than half of American goods produced for export went to Great Britain. The Navigation Acts (see Chapter 3) were still in effect, and “enumerated” items such as tobacco had to be landed first at a British port. Furs were added to the restricted list in 1722. The White Pines Acts passed in 1711, 1722, and 1729 forbade Americans from cutting white pine trees without a license. The purpose of this legislation was to reserve the best trees for the use of the Royal Navy. The Molasses Act of 1733—also called the Sugar Act—placed a heavy duty on molasses imported from foreign ports; the Hat and Felt Act of 1732 and the Iron Act of 1750 attempted to limit the production of colonial goods that competed with British exports. These statutes might have created tensions between the colonists and the mother country had they been rigorously enforced. Crown officials, however, generally ignored the new laws. New England merchants imported molasses from French Caribbean islands without paying the full customs; ironmasters in the Middle Colonies continued to produce iron. Even without the Navigation Acts, however, a majority of colonial exports would have been sold on the English market. The emerging consumer society in Great Britain was beginning to create a new generation of buyers who possessed enough income to purchase American goods, especially sugar and tobacco. This rising demand was the major market force shaping the colonial economy. Colonial merchants operating out of Boston, Newport, and Philadelphia also carried substantial tonnage to the West Indies. In 1768, this market accounted for 27 percent of all American exports. If there was a triangular trade that included the west coast of Africa, it does not seem to have been economically significant. Colonial ships carrying food sailed for the Caribbean and returned immediately to the Middle Colonies or New England with cargoes of molasses, sugar, and rum. In fact, recent research indicates that during the eighteenth century, trade with Africa involved less than 1 percent of all American exports. Slaves were transported directly to colonial ports where they were sold for cash or credit. The West Indies played a vital role in preserving American credit in Europe. Without this source of income, colonists would not have been able to pay for the manufactured items they purchased in the mother country. To be sure, they exported American products in great quantity to Great Britain, but the value of the exports seldom equaled the cost of British goods shipped back to the colonists. To cover this small but recurrent deficit, colonial merchants relied on profits made in the West Indies.

Birth of a Consumer Society
 After midcentury, however, the balance of trade turned dramatically against the colonists. The reasons for this change were complex, but, in simplest terms, Americans began buying



 more English goods than their parents or grandparents had done. Between 1740 and 1770, English exports to the American colonies increased by an astounding 360 percent, a veritable consumer revolution in the colonies. In part, this shift reflected a fundamental transformation in the British economy. Although the Industrial Revolution was still far in the future, the pace of the British economy picked up dramatically after 1690. Small factories produced certain goods more efficiently and more cheaply than the colonists could. The availability of these products altered the lives of most Americans, even those with modest incomes. Staffordshire china replaced crude earthenware; imported cloth replaced homespun. Franklin noted in his Autobiography how changing consumer habits affected his life. For years, he had eaten his breakfast in an earthenware bowl with a pewter spoon, but one morning it was served “in a china bowl, with a spoon of silver.” Franklin observed that “this was the first appearance of plate and china in our house which afterwards in the course of years, as our wealth increased, augmented gradually to several hundred pounds in value.” In this manner, British industrialization undercut American handicraft and folk art. To help Americans purchase manufactured goods, British merchants offered generous credit. Colonists deferred settlement by agreeing to pay interest on their debts. The temptation to acquire English finery blinded many people to hard economic realities. They gambled on the future, hoping bumper farm crops would reduce their dependence on the large merchant houses of London and Glasgow. Obviously, some persons lived within their means, but the aggregate American debt continued to grow. Colonial leaders tried various expedients to remain solvent—issuing paper money, for example—and while these efforts delayed a crisis, the balance-of-payments problem was clearly very serious. The eighteenth century also saw a substantial increase in intercoastal trade. Southern planters sent tobacco and rice to New England and the Middle Colonies, where these staples were exchanged for meat and wheat as well as goods imported from Great Britain. By 1760, approximately 30 percent of the colonists’ total tonnage capacity was involved in this extensive “coastwise” commerce. In addition, backcountry farmers in western Pennsylvania and the Shenandoah Valley carried their grain to market along an old Iroquois trail that became known as the Great Wagon Road, a rough, hilly highway that by the time of the Revolution stretched 735 miles along the Blue Ridge Mountains to Camden, South Carolina. Most of their produce was carried in long, gracefully designed Conestoga wagons. These vehicles— sometimes called the “wagons of empire”—had been invented by German immigrants living in the Conestoga River Valley in Lancaster County, Pennsylvania. The shifting patterns of trade had immense effects on the development of an American culture. First, the flood of British imports eroded local and regional identities. Commerce helped to “Anglicize” American culture by exposing colonial consumers to a common range of British manufactured goods. Deep sectional differences remained, of course, but Americans from New Hampshire to Georgia were increasingly drawn into a sophisticated economic network centered in London. Second, the expanding coastal and overland trade brought colonists of



CHAPT ER 4

EXPERIENCE OF EMPIRE: EIGHTEENTH-CENTURY AMERICA

Susquehanna
R.


The Great Awakening


NEW JERSEY

PENNSYLVANIA
Lancaster 
Philadelphia


 io R .

York


Po
 to m ac

Oh


 DELAWARE

R.


Winchester


S
MO BL HEN UN UE AN TA DO INS AH VA LLE RI Y DG E

MARYLAND
Staunton James R. 
 AP

PA LA CH I

 AN

 VIRGINIA

Salem


Salisbury


Roa
 no ke R

.


NORTH CAROLINA

Great Wagon Road


ATLANTIC OCEAN

Camden


SOUTH CAROLINA S

 av an n

 ah R.





 200 miles 200 kilometers

THE GREAT WAGON ROAD
By the mid-eighteenth century, the Great Wagon Road had become the major highway for the settlers in the Virginia and Carolina backcountry. 
 different backgrounds into more frequent contact. Ships that sailed between New England and South Carolina, and between Virginia and Pennsylvania, provided dispersed Americans with a means to exchange ideas and experiences on a more regular basis. Mid-eighteenth-century printers, for example, established several dozen new journals; these were weekly newspapers that carried information not only about the mother country and world commerce but also about events in other colonies.

Religious Revivals in Provincial
Societies
 How did the Great Awakening transform the religious culture of colonial America? A sudden, spontaneous series of Protestant revivals known as the Great Awakening had a profound impact on the lives of ordinary people. This unprecedented evangelical outpouring altered the course of American history. In our own time, of course, the force of religious revival has been witnessed in different regions throughout the world. It is no exaggeration to claim that a similar populist movement took place in mid-eighteenth-century America, and the new, highly personal appeal to a “new birth” in Christ caused men and women of all backgrounds to rethink basic assumptions about church and state, institutions and society.

 Only with hindsight does the Great Awakening seem a unified religious movement. Revivals occurred in different places at different times; the intensity of the events varied from region to region. The first signs of a spiritual awakening appeared in New England during the 1730s, but within a decade the revivals in this area had burned themselves out. It was not until the 1750s and 1760s that the Awakening made more than a superficial impact on the people of Virginia. The revivals were most important in Massachusetts, Connecticut, Rhode Island, Pennsylvania, New Jersey, and Virginia. Their effect on religion in New York, Delaware, and the Carolinas was marginal. No single religious denomination or sect monopolized the Awakening. In New England, revivals shattered Congregational churches, and in the South, especially in Virginia, they had an impact on Presbyterians, Methodists, and Baptists. Moreover, there was nothing peculiarly American about the Great Awakening. Mid-eighteenth-century Europe experienced a similar burst of religious emotionalism. Whatever their origins, the seeds of revival were generally sown on fertile ground. In the early decades of the century, many Americans—but especially New Englanders—complained that organized religion had lost vitality. They looked back at Winthrop’s generation with nostalgia, assuming that common people at that time must have possessed greater piety than did later, more worldly colonists. Congregational ministers seemed obsessed with dull, scholastic matters; they no longer touched the heart. And in the Southern Colonies, there were simply not enough ordained ministers to tend to the religious needs of the population. The Great Awakening arrived unexpectedly in Northampton, a small farm community in western Massachusetts, sparked by Jonathan Edwards, the local Congregational minister. Edwards accepted the traditional teachings of Calvinism (see Chapter 1), reminding his parishioners that their eternal fate had been determined by an omnipotent God, there was nothing they could do to save themselves, and they were totally dependent on the Lord’s will. He thought his fellow ministers had grown soft. They left men and women with the mistaken impression that sinners might somehow avoid eternal damnation simply by performing good works. “How dismal will it be,” Edwards told his complacent congregation, “when you are under these racking torments, to know assuredly that you never, never shall be delivered from them.” Why this uncompromising message set off several religious revivals during the mid-1730s is not known. Whatever the explanation for the popular response to Edwards’s preaching, young people began flocking to the church. They experienced a searing conversion, a sense of “new birth” and utter dependence on God. “Surely,” Edwards pronounced, “this is the Lord’s doing, and it is marvelous in our eyes.” The excitement spread, and evangelical ministers concluded that God must be preparing Americans, his chosen people, for the millennium. “What is now seen in America and especially in New England,” Edwards explained, “may prove the dawn of that glorious day.”

The Voice of Evangelical Religion
 Edwards was an outstanding theologian, but he did not possess the dynamic personality required to sustain the revival. That responsibility fell to George Whitefield, a young, inspiring preacher

Religious Revivals in Provincial Societies


Read the Document


Jonathan Edwards,
“Sinners in the Hands of an Angry God”


 The Reverend Jonathan Edwards (1703–1858) was an influential author and theologian whose preaching contributed to the Great Awakening.

 from England who toured the colonies from New Hampshire to Georgia. While Whitefield was not an original thinker, he was an extraordinarily effective public speaker. And like his friend Benjamin Franklin, he came to symbolize the powerful cultural forces that were transforming the Atlantic world. According to Edwards’s wife, Sarah, it was wonderful to witness what a spell Whitefield “casts over an audience . . . I have seen upwards of a thousand people hang on his words with breathless silence, broken only by an occasional half-suppressed sob.” Whitefield’s audiences came from all groups of American society: rich and poor, young and old, rural and urban. While Whitefield described himself as a Calvinist, he welcomed all Protestants. He spoke from any pulpit that was available. “Don’t tell me you are a Baptist, an Independent, a Presbyterian, a dissenter,” he thundered, “tell me you are a Christian, that is all I want.” Whitefield was a brilliant entrepreneur. Like Franklin, with whom he published many popular volumes, the itinerant minister possessed an almost intuitive sense of how this burgeoning consumer society could be turned to his own advantage, and he embraced the



 latest merchandising techniques. He appreciated, for example, the power of the press in selling the revival, and he regularly promoted his own work in advertisements placed in British and American newspapers. The crowds flocked to hear Whitefield, while his critics grumbled about the commercialization of religion. One anonymous writer in Massachusetts noted that there was “a very wholesome law of the province to discourage Pedlars in Trade” and it seemed high time “to enact something for the discouragement of Pedlars in Divinity also.” Other American-born itinerant preachers followed Whitefield’s example. The most famous was Gilbert Tennent, a Presbyterian of Scots-Irish background who had been educated in the Middle Colonies. His sermon “On the Danger of an Unconverted Ministry,” printed in 1741, set off a storm of protest from established ministers who were understandably insulted. Lesser known revivalists traveled from town to town, colony to colony, challenging local clergymen who seemed hostile to evangelical religion. Men and women who thronged to hear the itinerants were called “New Lights,” and during the 1740s and 1750s, many congregations split between defenders of the new emotional preaching and those who regarded the entire movement as dangerous nonsense. Despite Whitefield’s successes, many ministers remained suspicious of the itinerants and their methods. Some complaints may have amounted to little more than sour grapes. One “Old Light” spokesman labeled Tennent “a monster! impudent and noisy.” He claimed Tennent told anxious Christians that “they were damned! damned! damned! This charmed them; and, in the most dreadful winter I ever saw, people wallowed in snow, night and day, for the benefit of his beastly brayings; and many ended their days under these fatigues.” Charles Chauncy, minister of the prestigious First Church of Boston, raised much more troubling issues. How could the revivalists be certain God had sparked the Great Awakening? Perhaps the itinerants had relied too much on emotion? “Let us esteem those as friends of religion,” Chauncy advised, “. . . who warn us of the danger of enthusiasm, and would put us on our guard, that we may not be led aside by it.” Despite occasional anti-intellectual outbursts, the New Lights founded several important centers of higher learning. They wanted to train young men who would carry on the good works of Edwards, Whitefield, and Tennent. In 1746, New Light Presbyterians established the College of New Jersey, which later became Princeton University. Just before his death, Edwards was appointed its president. The evangelical minister Eleazar Wheelock launched Dartmouth (1769); other revivalists founded Brown (1764) and Rutgers (1766). The Great Awakening also encouraged men and women who had been taught to remain silent before traditional figures of authority to speak up, to take an active role in their salvation. They could no longer rely on ministers or institutions. The individual alone stood before God. Knowing this, New Lights made religious choices that shattered the old harmony among Protestant sects, and in its place, they introduced a noisy, often bitterly fought competition. As one New Jersey Presbyterian explained, “There are so many particular sects and Parties among professed Christians . . . that we know not . . . in which of these different paths, to steer our course for Heaven.” Expressive evangelicalism struck a particularly responsive chord among African Americans. Itinerant ministers frequently



CHAPT ER 4

EXPERIENCE OF EMPIRE: EIGHTEENTH-CENTURY AMERICA

Read the Document


Benjamin Franklin on
George Whitefield (1771)


 course, the New Lights did not sound much different than the mildly rationalist American spokesmen of the Enlightenment. Both groups prepared the way for the development of a revolutionary mentality in colonial America.

Clash of Political Cultures
 Why were eighteenth-century colonial assemblies not fully democratic? The political history of this period illuminates a growing tension within the empire. Americans of all regions repeatedly stated their desire to replicate British political institutions. Parliament, they claimed, provided a model for the American assemblies. They revered the English constitution. However, the more the colonists studied British political theory and practice—in other words, the more they attempted to become British—the more aware they became of major differences. By trying to copy Great Britain, they unwittingly discovered something about being American.

The English Constitution


 The fervor of the Great Awakening was intensified by the eloquence of itinerant preachers such as George Whitefield, the most popular evangelical of the mid-eighteenth century.

 preached to large sympathetic audiences of slaves. Richard Allen (1760–1831), founder of the African Methodist Episcopal Church, reported he owed his freedom in part to a traveling Methodist minister who persuaded Allen’s master of the sinfulness of slavery. Allen himself was converted, as were thousands of other black colonists. According to one historian, evangelical preaching “shared enough with traditional African styles and beliefs such as spirit possession and ecstatic expression . . . to allow for an interpenetration of African and Christian religious beliefs.” With religious contention came an awareness of a larger community, a union of fellow believers that extended beyond the boundaries of town and colony. In fact, evangelical religion was one of several forces at work during the mid-eighteenth century that brought scattered colonists into contact with one another for the first time. In this sense, the Great Awakening was a “national” event long before a nation actually existed. People who had been touched by the Great Awakening shared an optimism about the future of America. With God’s help, social and political progress was possible, and from this perspective, of

 During the eighteenth century, political discussion began with the British constitution. It was the object of universal admiration. Unlike the U.S. Constitution of 1788, the British constitution was not a formal written document. It was something much more elusive. The English constitution found expression in a growing body of law, court decisions, and statutes, a sense of traditional political arrangements that people of all classes believed had evolved from the past, preserving life, liberty, and property. In theory, the English constitution contained three distinct parts. The monarch was at the top, advised by handpicked court favorites. Next came the House of Lords, a body of 180 aristocrats who served with 26 Anglican bishops as the upper house of Parliament. And third was the House of Commons, composed of 558 members elected by various constituencies scattered throughout the realm. Political theorists waxed eloquent on workings of the British constitution. Each of the three parts of government, it seemed, represented a separate socioeconomic interest: king, nobility, and common people. Acting alone, each body would run to excess, even tyranny, but operating within a mixed system, they automatically checked each other’s ambitions for the common good. “Herein consists the excellence of the English government,” explained the famed eighteenth-century jurist Sir William Blackstone, “that all parts of it form a mutual check upon each other.” Unlike the delegates who wrote the Constitution of the United States, eighteenthcentury Englishmen did not perceive their constitution as a balance of executive, legislative, and judicial branches.

The Reality of British Politics
 The reality of daily political life in Great Britain, however, bore little relation to theory. The three elements of the constitution did not, in fact, represent distinct socioeconomic groups. Men elected to the House of Commons often came from the same social background as

Clash of Political Cultures


Read the Document


English Bill of Rights (1689)


 This political cartoon, published in London in 1727, denounces corruption in the British electoral system. It warns that if politicians gave into the temptation to use their offices for their own self-interest—one of the chief concerns of Whig ideology—then “Men will be Corrupted and Liberty sold.”

 those who served in the House of Lords. All represented the interests of Britain’s landed elite. Moreover, there was no attempt to maintain strict constitutional separation. The king, for example, organized parliamentary associations, loose groups of political followers who sat in the House of Commons and who openly supported the monarch’s policies in exchange for patronage or pension. The claim that the members of the House of Commons represented all the people of England also seemed far-fetched. As of 1715, no more than 20 percent of Britain’s adult males had the right to vote. Property qualifications or other restrictions often greatly reduced the number of eligible voters. In addition, the size of the electoral districts varied throughout the kingdom. In some boroughs, representatives to Parliament were chosen by several thousand voters. In many districts, however, a handful of electors controlled the result. These tiny, or “rotten,” boroughs were an embarrassment. The Methodist leader John Wesley complained that Old Sarum, an almost uninhabited borough, “in spite of common sense, without house or inhabitant, still sends two members to the parliament.” Since these districts were so small, a wealthy lord or ambitious politician could easily bribe or otherwise “influence” the entire constituency, something done regularly throughout the century. Before 1760, few people spoke out against these constitutional abuses. The main exception was a group of radical



 publicists whom historians have labeled the Commonwealthmen. These writers decried the corruption of political life, noting that a nation that compromised civic virtue, that failed to stand vigilant against fawning courtiers and would-be despots, deserved to lose its liberty and property. The most famous Commonwealthmen were John Trenchard and Thomas Gordon, who penned a series of essays titled Cato’s Letters between 1720 and 1723. If England’s rulers were corrupt, they warned, then the people could not expect the balanced constitution to save them from tyranny. In one typical article, Trenchard and Gordon observed, “The Appitites . . . of Men, especially of Great Men, are carefully to be observed and stayed, or else they will never stay themselves. The Experience of every Age convinces us, that we must not judge of Men by what they ought to do, but by what they will do.” But, however shrilly these writers protested, they won little support for political reforms. Most eighteenthcentury Englishmen admitted there was more than a grain of truth in the commonwealth critique, but they were not willing to tamper with a system of government that had so recently survived a civil war and a Glorious Revolution. Americans, however, took Trenchard and Gordon to heart.

Governing the Colonies: The American
Experience
 The colonists assumed—perhaps naively—that their own governments were modeled on the balanced constitution of Great Britain. They argued that within their political systems, the governor corresponded to the king and the governor’s council to the House of Lords. The colonial assemblies were perceived as American reproductions of the House of Commons and were expected to preserve the interests of the people against those of the monarch and aristocracy. As the colonists discovered, however, general theories about a mixed constitution were even less relevant in America than they were in Britain. By midcentury a majority of the mainland colonies had royal governors appointed by the crown. Many were career army officers who through luck, charm, or family connection had gained the ear of someone close to the king. These patronage posts did not generate income sufficient to interest the most powerful or talented personalities of the period, but they did draw middle-level bureaucrats who were ambitious, desperate, or both. It is perhaps not surprising that most governors decided simply not to “consider any Thing further than how to sit easy.”



CHAPT ER 4

EXPERIENCE OF EMPIRE: EIGHTEENTH-CENTURY AMERICA

 George Clinton, who served as New York’s governor from 1743 to 1753, was probably typical of the men who hoped to “sit easy.” Before coming to the colonies, Clinton had compiled an extraordinary record of ineptitude as a naval officer. He gained the governorship more as a means to get him out of England than as a sign of respect. When he arrived in New York City, Clinton ignored the colonists. “In a province given to hospitality,” wrote one critic, “he [Clinton] erred by immuring himself in the fort, or retiring to a grotto in the country, where his time was spent with his bottle and a little trifling circle.” Whatever their demerits, royal governors in America possessed enormous powers. In fact, royal governors could do certain things in America that a king could not do in eighteenth-century Britain. Among these were the right to veto legislation and dismiss judges. The governors also served as military commanders in each province. Political practice in America differed from the British model in another crucial respect. Royal governors were advised by a council, usually a body of about twelve wealthy colonists selected by the Board of Trade in London upon the recommendation of the governor. During the seventeenth century, the council had played an important role in colonial government, but its ability to exercise independent authority declined steadily over the course of the eighteenth century. Its members certainly did not represent a distinct aristocracy within American society. If royal governors did not look like kings, nor American councils like the House of Lords, colonial assemblies bore little resemblance to the eighteenth-century House of Commons. The major difference was the size of the American franchise. In most colonies, adult white males who owned a small amount of land could vote in colonywide elections. One historian estimates that 95 percent of this group in Massachusetts were eligible to participate in elections. The number in Virginia was about 85 percent. These figures— much higher than those in contemporary England—have led some scholars to view the colonies as “middle-class democracies,” societies run by moderately prosperous yeomen farmers who—in politics at least—exercised independent judgment. There were too many of them to bribe, no “rotten” boroughs, and when these people moved west, colonial assemblies usually created new electoral districts. Colonial governments were not democracies in the modern sense of that term. Possessing the right to vote was one thing, exercising it quite another. Americans participated in elections when major issues were at stake—the formation of banks in mideighteenth-century Massachusetts, for example—but most of the time they were content to let members of the rural and urban gentry represent them in the assemblies. To be sure, unlike modern democracies, these colonial politics excluded women and nonwhites from voting. The point to remember, however, is that the power to expel legislative rascals was always present in America, and it was this political reality that kept autocratic gentlemen from straying too far from the will of the people.

Colonial Assemblies
 Elected members of the colonial assemblies believed that they had a special obligation to preserve colonial liberties. They perceived any attack on the legislature as an assault on the rights

 of Americans. The elected representatives brooked no criticism, and several colonial printers landed in jail because they criticized actions taken by a lower house. So aggressive were these bodies in seizing privileges, determining procedures, and controlling money bills that some historians have described the political development of eighteenth-century America as “the rise of the assemblies.” No doubt this is exaggerated, but the long series of imperial wars against the French, demanding large public expenditures, transformed the small, amateurish assemblies of the seventeenth century into the more professional, vigilant legislatures of the eighteenth. This political system seemed designed to generate hostility. There was simply no reason for the colonial legislators to cooperate with appointed royal governors. Alexander Spotswood, Virginia’s governor from 1710 to 1722, for example, attempted to institute a bold new land program backed by the crown. He tried persuasion and gifts and, when these failed, chicanery. But the members of the House of Burgesses refused to support a plan that did not suit their own interests. Before leaving office, Spotswood gave up trying to carry out royal policy in America. Instead, he allied himself with the local Virginia gentry who controlled the House as well as the Council, and because they awarded their new friend with large tracts of land, he became a wealthy man. A major source of shared political information was the weekly journal, a new and vigorous institution in American life. In New York and Massachusetts especially, weekly newspapers urged readers to preserve civic virtue, to exercise extreme vigilance against the spread of privileged power. In the first issue of the Independent Reflector, published in New York (November 30, 1752), the editor announced defiantly that no discouragement shall “deter me from vindicating the civil and religious RIGHTS of my Fellow-Creatures: From exposing the peculiar Deformity of publick Vice, and Corruption; and displaying the amiable Charms of Liberty, with the detestable Nature of Slavery and Oppression.” Through such journals, a pattern of political rhetoric that in Britain had gained only marginal respectability became after 1765 America’s normal form of political discourse. The rise of the assemblies shaped American culture in other, subtler ways. Over the course of the century, the language of the law became increasingly Anglicized. The Board of Trade, the Privy Council, and Parliament scrutinized court decisions and legislative actions from all thirteen mainland colonies. As a result, varying local legal practices that had been widespread during the seventeenth century became standardized. Indeed, according to one historian, the colonial legal system by 1750 “was substantially that of the mother country.” Not surprisingly, many men who served in colonial assemblies were either lawyers or persons who had received legal training. When Americans from different regions met—as they frequently did in the years before the Revolution— they discovered that they shared a commitment to the preservation of the English common law. As eighteenth-century political developments drew the colonists closer to the mother country, they also brought Americans a greater awareness of each other. As their horizons widened, they learned they operated within the same general imperial system, and the problems confronting the Massachusetts House of

Century of Imperial War


 Representatives were not too different from those facing Virginia’s House of Burgesses or South Carolina’s Commons House. Like the revivalists and merchants—people who crossed old boundaries— colonial legislators laid the foundation for a larger cultural identity.

Century of Imperial War
 Why did colonial Americans support Great Britain’s wars against France? On paper, at least, the British colonies enjoyed military superiority over the settlements of New France. Louis XIV (r. 1643–1715) possessed an impressive army of 100,000 well-armed troops, but he dispatched few of them to the New World. He left the defense of Canada and the Mississippi Valley to the companies engaged in the fur trade. Meeting this challenge seemed almost impossible for the French outposts strung out along the St. Lawrence River and the Great Lakes. In 1754, New France contained only 75,000 inhabitants as compared to 1.2 million people living in Britain’s mainland colonies. For most of the century, the theoretical advantages enjoyed by the English colonists did them little good. While the British settlements possessed a larger and more prosperous population, they were divided into separate governments that sometimes seemed more suspicious of each other than of the French. When war came, French officers and Indian allies exploited these jealousies with considerable skill. Moreover, although the population of New France was comparatively small, it was concentrated along the St. Lawrence, so that while the French found it difficult to mount effective offensive operations against the English, they could easily mass the forces needed to defend Montreal and Quebec.

 King William’s and Queen Anne’s Wars Colonial involvement in imperial war began in 1689, when England’s new king, William III, declared war on Louis XIV. Europeans called this struggle the War of the League of Augsburg, but to the Americans, it was simply King William’s War. Canadians commanded by the Comte de Frontenac raided the northern frontiers of New York and New England, and while they made no territorial gains, they caused considerable suffering among the civilian populations of Massachusetts and New York. The war ended with the Treaty of Ryswick (1697), but the colonists were drawn almost immediately into a new conflict. Queen Anne’s War, known in Europe as the War of the Spanish Succession (1702–1713), was fought across a large geographic area. The bloody combat along the American frontier ended in 1713 when Great Britain and France signed the Treaty of Utrecht. European negotiators showed little interest in the military situation in the New World. Their major concern was preserving a balance of power among the European states. More than two decades of intense fighting had taken a heavy toll in North America, but neither French nor English colonists had much to show for their sacrifice. Both sides viewed this great contest in conspiratorial terms. From South Carolina to Massachusetts Bay, colonists believed the French planned to “encircle” the English settlements, to confine the English to a narrow strip of land along the Atlantic coast.



 The English noted that in 1682, La Salle had claimed for the king of France a territory—Louisiana—that included all the people and resources located on “streams and Rivers” flowing into the Mississippi River. To make good on their claim, the French constructed forts on the Chicago and Illinois rivers. In 1717, they established a military post two hundred miles up the Alabama River, well within striking distance of the Carolina frontier, and in 1718, they settled New Orleans. One New Yorker declared in 1715 that “it is impossible that we and the French can both inhabit this Continent in peace but that one nation must at last give way to the other.” On their part, the French suspected their rivals intended to seize all of North America. Land speculators and frontier traders pushed aggressively into territory claimed by the French and owned by the Native Americans. In 1716, one Frenchman urged his government to hasten the development of Louisiana, since “it is not difficult to guess that their [the British] purpose is to drive us entirely out . . . of North America.” To their great sorrow and eventual destruction, the original inhabitants of the frontier, the Native Americans, were swept up in this undeclared war. The Indians maneuvered to hold their own in the “middle ground.” The Iroquois favored the British; the Algonquian peoples generally supported the French. But regardless of the groups to which they belonged, Indian warriors—acting independently and for their own strategic reasons—found themselves enmeshed in imperial policies set by distant European kings.

 King George’s War and Its Aftermath In 1743, the Americans were dragged once again into the imperial conflict. During King George’s War (1743–1748), known in Europe as the War of the Austrian Succession, the colonists scored a magnificent victory over the French. Louisbourg, a gigantic fortress on Cape Breton Island, the easternmost promontory of Canada, guarded the approaches to the Gulf of St. Lawrence and Quebec. It was described as the Gibraltar of the New World. An army of New England troops under the command of William Pepperrell captured Louisbourg in June 1745, a feat that demonstrated the British colonists were able to fight and to mount effective joint operations. The Americans, however, were in for a shock. When the war ended with the signing of the Treaty of Aix-la-Chapelle in 1748, the British government handed Louisbourg back to the French in exchange for concessions elsewhere. Such decisions exposed the deep and continuing ambivalence the colonists felt about participation in imperial wars. They were proud to support Great Britain, of course, but the Americans seldom fully understood why the wars were being fought, why certain tactics had been adopted, and why the British accepted treaty terms that so blatantly ignored colonial interests. The French were not prepared to surrender an inch. But as they recognized, time was running against them. Not only were the English colonies growing more populous, but they also possessed a seemingly inexhaustible supply of manufactured goods to trade with the Indians. The French decided in the early 1750s, therefore, to seize the Ohio Valley before the Virginians could do so. They established forts throughout the region, the most formidable being Fort Duquesne, located at the strategic fork in the Ohio River and later renamed Pittsburgh.



CHAPT ER 4

EXPERIENCE OF EMPIRE: EIGHTEENTH-CENTURY AMERICA

 This mid-eighteenth-century lithograph portrays colonial assault troops, under the command of William Pepperrell, establishing a beachhead at Freshwater Cove near Louisbourg. Pepperrell’s troops went on to capture the French fortress at Louisbourg.

 Although France and England had not officially declared war, British officials advised the governor of Virginia to “repell force by force.” The Virginians needed little encouragement. They were eager to make good their claim to the Ohio Valley, and in 1754, militia companies under the command of a promising young officer, George Washington, constructed Fort Necessity not far from Fort Duquesne. The plan failed. French and Indian troops overran the badly exposed outpost (July 3, 1754). Among other things, the humiliating setback revealed that a single colony could not defeat the French.

 Albany Congress and Braddock’s Defeat Benjamin Franklin, for one, appreciated the need for intercolonial cooperation. When British officials invited representatives from Virginia and Maryland as well as the northern colonies to Albany (June 1754) to discuss relations with the Iroquois, Franklin used the occasion to present a bold blueprint for colonial union. His socalled Albany Plan envisioned the formation of a Grand Council, made up of elected delegates from the various colonies, to oversee matters of common defense, western expansion, and Indian affairs. A President General appointed by the king would preside. Franklin’s most daring suggestion involved taxation. He insisted the council be authorized to collect taxes to cover military expenditures.

 First reaction to the Albany Plan was enthusiastic. To take effect, however, it required the support of the separate colonial assemblies as well as Parliament. It received neither. The assemblies were jealous of their fiscal authority, and the English thought the scheme undermined the Crown’s power over American affairs. In 1755, the Ohio Valley again became the scene of fierce fighting. Even though there was still no formal declaration of war, the British resolved to destroy Fort Duquesne, and to that end, they dispatched units of the regular army to America. In command was Major General Edward Braddock, an obese, humorless veteran who inspired neither fear nor respect. One colonist described Braddock as “very indolent, Slave to his passions, women & wine, as great an Epicure as could be in his eating, tho a brave man.” On July 9, Braddock led a joint force of twenty-five hundred British redcoats and colonists to humiliating defeat. The French and Indians opened fire as Braddock’s army waded across the Monongahela River, about eight miles from Fort Duquesne. Along a narrow road already congested with heavy wagons and confused men, Braddock ordered a counterattack, described by one of his officers as “without any form or order but that of a parcell of school boys coming out of s[c]hool.” Nearly 70 percent of Braddock’s troops were killed or wounded in western Pennsylvania. The general himself died in battle. The French, who suffered only light casualties, remained in firm control of the Ohio Valley.

Century of Imperial War


View the Map




European Claims in America c. 1750


RUSSIAN AMERICA
Hudson Bay 
 ur Misso

St


 LOUISIANA

Oh


St. Pierre &
Miquelon (Fr.)


 e

Quebec
Montreal


Louisbourg


.
 io R

BRITISH COLONIES

New
Orleans


NEW AI SP

Gulf of
Mexico


N


PA C I F I C OCEAN

 French fishing rights

.


Mississ
 ippi R. Di sp ute d

 iR

E
NC RAR.

L NE
 aw W ren F c

GRANT TO HUDSON'S BAY COMPANY

Cuba
Jamaica


AT L A N T I C OCEAN

St. Domingue
(Fr.)
Puerto Rico
Guadeloupe
(Sp.)
(Fr.)
Martinique
(Fr.)


Caribbean Sea


 GUIANA (Dutch)

 British claims

NEW GRANADA

 French claims Spanish claims



 Russian claims





 1000 miles

 BRAZIL (Port.)

 500 1000 kilometers

NORTH AMERICA, 1750
By 1750, the French had established a chain of settlements southward through the heart of the continent from Quebec to New Orleans. The British saw this development as a threat to their own seaboard colonies, which were expanding westward. The entire affair profoundly angered Washington, who fumed, “We have been most scandalously beaten by a trifling body of men.” The British thought their allies the Iroquois might desert them after the embarrassing defeat. The Indians, however, took the news in stride, observing that “they were not at all surprised to hear it, as they [Braddock’s redcoats] were men who had crossed the Great Water and were unacquainted with the arts of war among the Americans.” 
Seven Years’ War
 Britain’s imperial war effort had hit bottom. No one in England or America seemed to possess the leadership necessary to drive the French from the Mississippi Valley. The cabinet of George II (r. 1727–1760) lacked the will to organize and finance a sustained military campaign in the New World, and colonial assemblies balked every time Britain asked them to raise men and money. On May 18, 1756, the British officially declared war on the

 French, a conflict called the French and Indian War in America and the Seven Years’ War in Europe. Had it not been for William Pitt, the most powerful minister in George’s cabinet, the military stalemate might have continued. This supremely self-confident Englishman believed he was the only person capable of saving the British empire, an opinion he publicly expressed. When he became effective head of the ministry in December 1756, Pitt had an opportunity to demonstrate his talents. In the past, warfare on the European continent had worked mainly to France’s advantage. Pitt saw no point in continuing to concentrate on Europe, and in 1757 he advanced a bold new imperial policy, one based on commercial assumptions. In Pitt’s judgment, the critical confrontation would take place in North America, where Britain and France were struggling to control colonial markets and raw materials. Indeed, according to Pitt, America was “where England and Europe are to be fought for.” He was determined, therefore, to expel the French from the continent, however great the cost.



CHAPT ER 4

EXPERIENCE OF EMPIRE: EIGHTEENTH-CENTURY AMERICA

Read the Document


Albany Plan of Union (1754)


 The first political cartoon to appear in an American newspaper was created by Benjamin Franklin in 1754 to emphasize the importance of the Albany Plan.

 To effect this ambitious scheme, Pitt took personal command of the army and navy. He mapped strategy. He even promoted young promising officers over the heads of their superiors. He also recognized that the success of the war effort could not depend on the generosity of the colonial assemblies. Great Britain would have to foot most of the bill. Pitt’s military expenditures, of course, created an enormous national debt that would soon haunt both Britain and its colonies, but at the time, no one foresaw the fiscal consequences of victory in America. To direct the grand campaign, Pitt selected two relatively obscure officers, Jeffrey Amherst and James Wolfe. It was a masterful choice, one that a less self-assured man than Pitt would never have risked. Both officers were young, talented, and ambitious, and on July 26, 1758, forces under their direction captured Louisbourg, the same fortress the colonists had taken a decade earlier! This victory cut the Canadians’ main supply line with France. The small population of New France could no longer meet the military demands placed on it. As the situation became increasingly desperate, the French forts of the Ohio Valley and the Great Lakes began to fall. Duquesne was simply abandoned late in 1758 as French and Indian troops under the Marquis

A CENTURY OF CONFLICT: MAJOR WARS, 1689–1763
European Name War of the League of Augsburg 
American
Name
King
 William’s War

1702–1713


War of the
Spanish
Succession


Queen
 Anne’s War

1743–1748


War of the
Austrian
Succession (War
 of Jenkin’s Ear)

King
 George’s War

1756–1763


Seven
Years’ War


French and
Indian War


Dates
1689–1697


Major Allies
Britain, Holland, Spain,
 their colonies, and Native American allies against France, its colonies, and Native American allies Britain, Holland, their colonies, and Native American allies against France, Spain, their colonies, and Native American allies Britain, its colonies, and Native American allies, and Austria against France, Spain, their Native American allies, and Prussia

 Britain, its colonies, and Native American allies against France, its colonies, and Native American allies

Issues
Opposition to
French bid for
 control of Europe

Austria and France
 hold rival claims to Spanish throne

 Struggle among Britain, Spain, and France for control of New World territory; among France, Prussia, and Austria for control of central Europe Struggle among Britain, Spain, and France for worldwide control of colonial markets and raw materials

Major American
Battle
New England
 troops assault Quebec under Sir William Phips (1690) Attack on Deerfield (1704)

Treaty
Treaty of
Ryswick (1697)


Treaty of
Utrecht (1713)


New England
Treaty of
 forces capture of Aix-la-Chapelle Louisbourg under (1748) William Pepperrell (1745)

British and
Peace of Paris
 Continental forces (1763) capture Quebec under Major General James Wolfe (1759)

W
 o

Century of Imperial War


 lfe

GRANT TO HUDSON'S BAY COMPANY

 Louisbourg besieged June 8–July 26, 1758

Halifax


A


 m

 h

 ce

 en

 wr

Ft. St. Frederic (Crown Point)
 abandoned July 31, 1759

 OCEAN

N.H.


BRITISH COLONIES

Hudson R.


Albany


N.Y.


 ke

AT L A N T I C

Ft. Carillon (Ticonderoga)
 abandoned July 26, 1759

Ft. Niagara
 besieged July 6–25, 1759

La


 e

L.
Champlain 

 st er

Lake
Ontario


 ie Er

Amh


 MAINE (part of Mass.)

St. L
 a

Montreal
 surrendered Sept. 8, 1760

 rs t

Disputed
R.


NEW FRANCE

Wolfe fr
 o G re a t B m r i tai n

 ACADIA

Plains of Abraham
(Quebec)
Sept. 13, 1759


Ft. Frontenac
 surrendered Aug. 27, 1758



N.J.


Boston


 French claims

 MASS.

 British claims British troop movements

CONN. R.I.

 British victories French victories

New York


PA.
Ft. Duquesne abandoned Nov. 25, 1758 Great Meadows May 28, 1754 
 Braddock's Defeat July 9, 1755

Philadelphia


MD.
Ft. Necessity July 3–4, 1754 
 DEL.



THE SEVEN YEARS’ WAR, 1756–1763



 200 miles 200 kilometers

 Major battle sites. The conflict ended with Great Britain driving

 the French from mainland North America.

 de Montcalm retreated toward Quebec and Montreal. During the summer of 1759, the French surrendered key forts at Ticonderoga, Crown Point, and Niagara. The climax to a century of war came dramatically in September 1759. Wolfe, now a major general, assaulted Quebec with nine thousand men. But it was not simply force of arms that brought victory. Wolfe proceeded as if he were preparing to attack the city directly, but under cover of darkness, his troops scaled a cliff to dominate a less well-defended position. At dawn on September 13, 1759, they took the French from the rear by surprise. The decisive action occurred on the Plains of Abraham, a bluff high above the St. Lawrence River. Both Wolfe and Montcalm were mortally wounded. When an aide informed Wolfe the French had been routed, he sighed, “Now, God be praised, I will die in peace.” On September 8, 1760, Amherst accepted the final surrender of the French army at Montreal. The Peace of Paris of 1763 signed on February 10, almost fulfilled Pitt’s grandiose dreams. Great Britain took possession of an empire that stretched around the globe. Only Guadeloupe and Martinique, the Caribbean sugar islands, were given back to the French. After a century-long struggle, the French had been driven from the mainland of North America. Even Louisiana passed out of France’s control into Spanish hands. The treaty gave Britain title to Canada, Florida, and all the land east of the Mississippi River. Moreover, with the stroke of a diplomat’s pen, eighty thousand

 French-speaking Canadians, most of them Catholics, became the subjects of George III. The Americans were overjoyed. It was a time of good feelings and national pride. Together, the English and their colonial allies had thwarted the “Gallic peril.” Samuel Davies, a Presbyterian who had brought the Great Awakening to Virginia, announced confidently that the long-awaited victory would inaugurate “a new heaven and a new earth.”

Perceptions of War
 The Seven Years’ War made a deep impression on American society. Even though Franklin’s Albany Plan had failed, the military struggle had forced the colonists to cooperate on an unprecedented scale. It also drew them into closer contact with Britain. They became aware of being part of a great empire, military and commercial, but in the very process of waging war, they acquired a more intimate sense of an America that lay beyond the plantation and the village. Confl ict had carried thousands of young men across colonial boundaries, exposing them to a vast territory full of opportunities for a booming population. Moreover, the war trained a corps of American officers, people like George Washington, who learned from firsthand experience that the British were not invincible.



 CHAPTER 4

EXPERIENCE OF EMPIRE: EIGHTEENTH-CENTURY AMERICA

View the Closer Look


European Claims in North America, 1750 and 1763


RUSSIAN AMERICA
Hudson Bay 
 French fishing rights

HUDSON'S BAY COMPANY
ce 
.
EC R EB U Q

SPANISH A LOUISIANA

NE W

PA C I F I C OCEAN

Mississip
 pi R.

R.


St. Pierre & Miquelon (Fr.)


 t. La wr en

La
 ke s

S


IND IAN RE SE RV E

 ri Missou

Grea
 t

.
 io R Oh

Proclamation Line of 1763


BRITISH COLONIES

AT L A N T I C OCEAN

St. Domingue
(Fr.)


AI SP

G lf off
Gulf
Mexico


Puerto Rico
(Sp.)


N


Cuba


Guadeloupe (Fr.)
Martinique (Fr.)


Jamaica


St. Lucia (Fr.)


Caribbean Sea


 GUIANA (Dutch)

NEW GRANADA

 British claims French claims Spanish claims



 Russian claims





 1000 miles

 BRAZIL (Port.)

 1000 kilometers

NORTH AMERICA AFTER 1763

 The Peace of Paris (1763) redrew the map of North America. Great Britain received all the French holdings except a few islands in the Atlantic and some sugar-producing islands in the Caribbean.

 British officials later accused the Americans of ingratitude. England, they claimed, had sent troops and provided funds to liberate the colonists from the threat of French attack. The Americans, appreciative of the aid from England, cheered on the British but dragged their feet at every stage, refusing to pay the bills. These charges were later incorporated into a general argument justifying parliamentary taxation in America. The British had a point. The colonists were, in fact, slow in providing the men and materials needed to fight the French. Nevertheless, they did make a significant contribution to the war

 effort, and it was perfectly reasonable for Americans to regard themselves at the very least as junior partners in the empire. After all, they had supplied almost twenty thousand soldiers and spent well over £2 million. In a single year, in fact, Massachusetts enlisted five thousand men out of an adult male population of about fifty thousand, a commitment that, in the words of one military historian, meant “the war was being waged on a scale comparable to the great wars of modern times.” After making such a sacrifice—indeed, after demonstrating their loyalty to the mother country—the colonists would surely have been disturbed to learn that General James

Conclusion: Rule Britannia?


 Wolfe, the hero of Quebec, had stated, “The Americans are in general the dirtiest, the most contemptible, cowardly dogs that you can conceive. There is no depending upon them in action. They fall down in their own dirt and desert in battalions, officers and all.”

Conclusion: Rule Britannia?
 James Thomson, an Englishman, understood the hold of empire on the popular imagination of the eighteenth century. In 1740, he composed words that British patriots have proudly sung for more than two centuries: Rule Britannia, rule the waves, Britons never will be slaves. Colonial Americans—at least, those of British background— joined the chorus. By midcentury they took their political and cultural cues from Great Britain. They fought its wars, purchased its



 consumer goods, flocked to hear its evangelical preachers, and read its many publications. Without question, the empire provided the colonists with a compelling source of identity. An editor justified the establishment of New Hampshire’s first newspaper in precisely these terms. “By this Means,” the publisher observed, “the spirited Englishman, the mountainous Welshman, the brave Scotchman, and Irishman, and the loyal American, may be firmly united and mutually RESOLVED to guard the glorious Throne of BRITANNIA . . . as British Brothers, in defending the Common Cause.” Even new immigrants, the Germans, Scots-Irish, and Africans, who felt no political loyalty to Great Britain and no affinity to English culture, had to assimilate to some degree to the dominant English culture of the colonies. Americans hailed Britannia. In 1763, they were the victors, the conquerors of the backcountry. In their moment of glory, the colonists assumed that Britain’s rulers saw the Americans as “Brothers,” as equal partners in the business of empire. Only slowly would they learn the British had a different perception. For them, “American” was a way of saying “not quite English.”



 CHAPTER 4

CHAPTER REVIEW

Study
 y Resources Take the Study Plan for Chapter 4 Experience of Empire on MyHistoryLab

TIME LINE 1680
El Popé leads Pueblo revolt against the Spanish in New Mexico 1689 William and Mary accede to the English throne 1706 Birth of Benjamin Franklin 1714 George I of Hanover becomes monarch of Great Britain 1732 Colony of Georgia is established; Birth of George Washington 1734–1736 First expression of the Great Awakening at Northampton, Massachusetts 1740 George Whitefield electrifies listeners at Boston 1745 Colonial troops capture Louisbourg 
 1748 American Lutheran ministers ordained

 in Philadelphia Albany Congress meets Braddock is defeated by the French and Indians in western Pennsylvania Seven Years’ War is formally declared British are victorious at Quebec; Wolfe and Montcalm are killed in battle George III becomes king of Great Britain Peace of Paris ending French and Indian War is signed Junípero Serra begins to build missions in California Mexico declares independence from Spain

CHAPTER REVIEW
Growth and Diversity What difficulties did Native Americans face in maintaining their cultural independence on the frontier? 
Religious Revivals in Provincial Societies
 How did the Great Awakening transform the religious culture of colonial America?

 Britain’s American colonies experienced extraordinary growth during the eighteenth century. German and Scots-Irish migrants poured into the backcountry, where they clashed with Native Americans. The Indians played off French and British imperial ambitions in the “middle ground,” but disease and encroachment by European settlers undermined the Indians’ ability to resist. (p. 80)

 The Great Awakening brought a new form of evangelical religion to ordinary Americans. It emphasized personal salvation through a “New Birth” and membership in a large community of believers. Itinerant preachers such as George Whitefield drew huge crowds throughout the colonies. Other ministers followed Whitefield, inviting ordinary Americans to question traditional religious authorities. (p. 90)

Spanish Borderlands of the Eighteenth Century


Clash of Political Cultures


 Why was the Spanish empire unable to control its northern frontier?

 Why were eighteenth-century colonial assemblies not fully democratic?

 During the late 1600s and early 1700s, the Spanish empire expanded its authority north of Mexico. New settlements were established in the Southwest and California. Although the Spanish constructed missions and forts, a lack of settlers and troops made it impossible for them to impose effective imperial authority. Much of the territory they claimed remained under the control of Indian peoples. (p. 83)

 Most eighteenth-century colonial governments were comprised of a royal governor, an appointed governor’s council, and an elected assembly. Although these representative assemblies did not allow women, blacks, or the poor to vote, they did enfranchise most of the white adult male population. Assemblies guarded their privileges and powers, often conflicting with royal governors who tried to expand their authority. (p. 92)

The Impact of European Ideas on American Culture


Century of Imperial War
 How did European ideas affect eighteenthcentury American life? During the Enlightenment, educated Europeans and American colonists, like Benjamin Franklin, brought scientific reason to the study of religion, nature, and society. By midcentury, economic growth sparked a consumer revolution that introduced colonists to an unprecedented array of imported manufactured items. New ideas and goods helped integrate the American colonies into mainstream British culture. (p. 87)

 Why did colonial Americans support Great Britain’s wars against France? France and Britain waged almost constant war in North America. By 1750, Britain’s American colonists believed the French in Canada planned to encircle their settlements, cutting them off from the rich lands of the Ohio Valley. The Seven Years’ War drove the French from Canada, a victory that generated unprecedented enthusiasm for the British Empire in the colonies. (p. 95)

STUDY RESOURCES



KEY TERMS AND DEFINITIONS
Backcountry In the eighteenth century, the edge of settlement extending from western Pennsylvania to Georgia. This region formed the second frontier as settlers moved west from the Atlantic coast into the interior. p. 80 Middle ground A geographical area where two distinct cultures meet and merge with neither holding a clear upper hand. p. 83 Enlightenment Philosophical and intellectual movement that began in Europe during the eighteenth century. It stressed the use of reason to solve social and scientific problems. p. 87 Consumer revolution Period between 1740 and 1770 when English exports to the American colonies increased by 360 percent to satisfy Americans’ demand for consumer goods. p. 89 Great Awakening A sudden, spontaneous, and fervent series of Protestant evangelical revivals beginning in the 1730s and through the 1740s and 1750s that occurred throughout the colonies. The Great Awakening encouraged men and women to take an active role in their salvation and helped connect scattered colonists together with a unifying 
 belief that, with God’s assistance, social and political progress was possible in colonial America. p. 90 Itinerant preachers These charismatic preachers spread revivalism throughout America during the Great Awakening. p. 91 Albany Plan Plan of intercolonial cooperation proposed by prominent colonists including Benjamin Franklin at a conference in Albany, New York, in 1754. The plan called for a Grand Council of elected delegates from the colonies that would have powers to tax and provide for the common defense. Although rejected by the colonial and British governments, it was a prototype for colonial union. p. 96 Seven Years’ War Worldwide conflict (1756–1763) that pitted Britain against France. With help from the American colonists, the British won the war and eliminated France as a power on the North American continent. Also known as the French and Indian War. p. 97 Peace of Paris of 1763 Treaty ending the French and Indian War by which France ceded Canada to Britain. p. 99

CRITICAL THINKING QUESTIONS 1.
What factors ultimately served to undermine the “middle ground”? 
 4. What are the similarities and differences between the impact of the Enlightenment and the Great Awakening on colonial society?

 2. What impact did the Spanish empire have on the culture of

 5. Why did colonists place greater political trust in their elected

 the borderlands?

 assemblies than in their royally appointed governors?

 3. What impact did Enlightenment ideas and commercial goods have on American politics?

 MyHistoryLab Media Assignments Find these resources in the Media Assignments folder for Chapter 4 on MyHistoryLab Growth and Diversity Read the Document Gentleman p. 79

◾


Clash of Political Cultures
William Byrd II, Diary—An American


Read the Document Benjamin Franklin, “Observations
Concerning the Increase of Mankind” p. 81


◾


Read the Document


English Bill of Rights (1689) p. 93


Century of Imperial War
View the Map


European Claims in America, c. 1750 p. 97


Spanish Borderlands of the Eighteenth Century
◾


Conquest by Other Means:
The Pennsylvania Walking Purchase p. 84


Read the Document Testimony by Pedro Naranjo to
Spanish Authorities p. 86


Religious Revivals in Provincial Societies
◾


Read the Document


Complete the Assignment


Read the Document Jonathan Edwards, “Sinners in the
Hands of an Angry God” p. 91
Read the Document
Whitfield (1771) p. 92


Benjamin Franklin on George


◾


Albany Plan of Union (1754) p. 98


View the Closer Look European Claims in North America,
1750 and 1763 p. 100


◾ Indicates Study Plan Media Assignment




The American Revolution:
From Elite Protest to Popular
Revolt, 1763–1783


Contents and Learning Objectives
STRUCTURE OF COLONIAL SOCIETY PG. 106

THE LOYALIST DILEMMA PG. 126

 Why did Americans resist parliamentary taxation?

 Why did so many Loyalists decide to leave the United States during the Revolution?

ERODING THE BONDS OF EMPIRE PG. 108
What events eroded the bonds of empire during the 1760s? 
WINNING THE PEACE PG. 127

STEPS TOWARD INDEPENDENCE PG. 116

How did Benjamin Franklin, John Adams, and John Jay
 secure a better peace treaty than Congress could have expected?

 What events in 1775 and 1776 led to the colonists’ decision to declare independence?

FIGHTING FOR INDEPENDENCE PG. 119
Why did it take eight years of warfare for the Americans to gain independence? 
 Listen to the Audio File on myhistorylab

FEATURE ESSAY
Spain’s Contribution to American Independence 
